North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-24 Meat Inspection [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; 2003, ch. 291, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-02.
Inspectors — Appointments — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-03.
Access by inspectors — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-04.
Marks and labels. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-05.
False or misleading marks, labels, and containers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-06.
Prohibitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-07.
Official marks and certificates — Required authorization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-08.
Horse meat — Requirements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-09.
Bribery. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-10.
Individual and custom processing — Exemption from inspection requirements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; 2003, ch. 291, § 2; 2003, ch. 292, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-11.
Storing and handling conditions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-12.
Articles not intended as human food. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-13.
Records. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-14.
Records — Examination. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-15.
Records — Retention. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-16.
Registration of business. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-17.
Dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals — Rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-18.
Cooperation with federal government. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-19.
Refusal or withdrawal of inspection. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-20.
Detention of animals or products. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-21.
Seizure and condemnation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-22.
Sale of condemned items. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-23.
Types of proceedings — Award of costs. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-24.
Powers of commissioner. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-25.
Interstate shipment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-24-26.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 320, § 1; 2009, ch. 299, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.